Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202483-182.02
Book donations; establish program.

The director shall establish a program to accept donations of books for use by committed offenders. The program shall seek to gather a culturally diverse selection of books.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 43.
July 19, 2024